Louisiana, session 2026, HB818.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:24.4(F)(7)(c) through (i) and 406.9(B)(15) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§24.4. Louisiana Competency-Based Education Program; statewide standards for
required subjects; Louisiana Educational Assessment Program; parish or city
school board comprehensive pupil progression plans; waivers
* * *
F.
* * *
(7)
* * *
(c)(i) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year
thereafter, no later than August first of each year, the department shall post on its
website a statewide mandated assessments schedule for administration during the
upcoming school year.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 818 ENROLLED
(ii) The schedule shall include only those assessments and screeners required
by federal law, state law, or rules of the state board and shall exclude assessments
required solely by a public school governing authority.
(iii) The schedule shall not require a login, password, or other restricted
access to view. The department shall also post the schedule in a portable document
format.
(iv) The department shall use a uniform template for the schedule, including
plain-language labels for delivery method. For each assessment listed on the
schedule, the department shall include, at a minimum, the assessment name and, if
applicable, vendor or publisher; the grade level assessed; the subject or content area;
the delivery method; the administration date or administration window, and any
make-up window; the number of administrations required per school year; the
estimated minutes per student administration; the estimated total minutes per student
per school year for the assessment; an authority field identifying whether the
assessment is required by federal law, state law, or rules of the state board; and a
citation field.
(v) The schedule shall be maintained on the website throughout the school
year and shall be updated no later than ten business days after any change to
statewide assessment requirements, administration dates or windows, frequency, or
duration estimates.
(vi) Information posted pursuant to this Subparagraph shall not include
personally identifiable student information or student-level assessment results.
(d)(i) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year
thereafter, no later than August first of each year, each public school governing
authority shall maintain on its website the assessment scheduling information as
provided by this Subparagraph.
(ii) No later than ten business days after the department posts or updates the
schedule pursuant to Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph, each public school
governing authority shall post on the website all of the following:
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 818 ENROLLED
(aa) A direct hyperlink to the most recent statewide mandated assessments
schedule as posted on the department's website.
(bb) A portable document format copy of the most recent statewide
mandated assessments schedule, which shall be the portable document format made
available by the department or a portable document format that is identical in
content.
(iii) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year
thereafter, no later than November first of each school year, each public school
governing authority shall post on the same website pursuant to Item (i) of this
Subparagraph a portable document format schedule of all locally adopted or required
benchmarks, interim assessments, screeners, progress-monitoring assessments, and
other locally required assessments for administration during that school year.
(iv) This schedule shall include all locally adopted or required benchmarks,
interim assessments, screeners, progress-monitoring assessments, and other locally
required assessments that are not required by federal law, state law, or rules of the
state board.
(v) The website and any schedules posted pursuant to this Subparagraph
shall not require a login, password, or other restricted access to view and shall be
maintained on the website throughout the school year.
(e)(i) The department shall prescribe a uniform template for the schedule as
provided by Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph, including plain-language labels for
delivery method.
(ii) For each locally adopted or required benchmark, interim assessment,
screener, progress-monitoring assessment, and other locally required assessment
listed on the schedule, the governing authority shall include, at a minimum, the
assessment name and, if applicable, vendor or publisher; the grade level or student
group assessed; the subject or content area, if applicable; the type of assessment; the
delivery method; the administration date or administration window; the number of
administrations required per school year; the estimated minutes per student per
administration; the estimated total minutes per student per school year for the
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 818 ENROLLED
assessment; the purpose of the assessment; the intended use of the results; the date
or estimated date by which results are expected to be available to educators and
parents; the local policy, rule, board action, administrative directive, or school
requirement requiring the assessment; and whether the assessment replaces,
supplements, or duplicates another assessment and, if so, the name of that other
assessment.
(iii) For purposes of this Paragraph, "administration window" means a range
of school days during which an assessment may be administered, and the days within
the range are not required to be consecutive.
(f)(i) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year
thereafter, no later than November first of each school year, each public school
governing authority shall submit to the department, in the form and manner
prescribed by the department, the information required to be posted as provided by
Subparagraphs (d), (e), and (h) of this Paragraph, including the internet address
where the schedule is posted.
(ii) No later than December twentieth of each year, the department shall
compile the submissions received pursuant to this Subparagraph and shall transmit
the compilation to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on
Education.
(iii) No later than January fifteenth of each year, the department shall publish
on its website a portable document format compilation of the submissions received
pursuant to this Subparagraph.
(g) Information posted and submitted pursuant to this Paragraph shall not
include personally identifiable student information or student-level assessment
results.
(h)(i) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year
thereafter, each public school governing authority shall prepare an annual local
assessment review report and shall post the report on the same website as the
schedule required by Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph no later than November first
of each school year.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 818 ENROLLED
(ii) The annual local assessment review report shall address, for each locally
adopted or required benchmark, interim assessment, screener, progress-monitoring
assessment, and other locally required assessment listed on the schedule required by
Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph, all of the following:
(aa) The time required to administer the assessment.
(bb) The purpose of the assessment.
(cc) The intended use of the results.
(dd) The timeliness of results.
(ee) Whether the assessment duplicates another assessment.
(ff) Whether the assessment was retained, reduced, consolidated, replaced,
or eliminated as a result of the annual review.
(iii) The report required by this Subparagraph shall be submitted to the
department in the form and manner prescribed by the department.
(i) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and for each school year
thereafter, the department shall annually publish on its website a consolidated
inventory of assessments and screeners required by federal law, state law, and rules
of the state board. The inventory shall not include personally identifiable student
information or student-level assessment results.
* * *
§406.9. Parents' Bill of Rights for Public Schools
* * *
B.
* * *
(15) To receive from the public school governing authority the statewide
mandated assessments schedule and the schedule of all locally adopted or required
benchmarks, interim assessments, screeners, progress-monitoring assessments, and
other locally required assessments applicable to the child's grade level, course
enrollment, and student group, if applicable, no later than ten business days after
such schedules are posted pursuant to R.S. 17:24.4(F)(7), and to be notified by email
as soon as possible of any revisions to such schedules. Such schedules shall be
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 818 ENROLLED
posted to the school's website and shall include, at a minimum, the information
required pursuant to R.S. 17:24.4(F)(7).
* * *
Section 2. The state Department of Education shall develop and publish any
templates and implementation materials necessary to implement the provisions of this Act
prior to the 2026-2027 school year, and the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education may adopt rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.